Nebraska, session 109, LB362.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 75-109.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-109.01 Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the Public
Service Commission shall have jurisdiction, as prescribed, over the following
subjects:
(1) Common carriers, generally, pursuant to sections 75-101 to 75-158;
(2) Grain pursuant to the Grain Dealer Act and the Grain Warehouse Act and
sections 89-1,104 to 89-1,108;
(3) Manufactured homes and recreational vehicles pursuant to the Uniform
Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles;
(4) Modular housing units pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Standards for
Modular Housing Units Act;
(5) Motor carrier registration, licensure, and safety pursuant to sections
75-301 to 75-343, 75-369.03, 75-370, and 75-371;
(6) Pipeline carriers and rights-of-way pursuant to the Major Oil Pipeline
Siting Act, the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, and sections 75-501 to
75-503. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with the provisions of
the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, the provisions of the Major Oil Pipeline
Siting Act control;
(7) Railroad carrier safety pursuant to sections 74-918, 74-919, 74-1323,
and 75-401 to 75-430;
(8) Telecommunications carriers pursuant to the Automatic Dialing-
Announcing Devices Act, the Emergency Telephone Communications Systems Act, the
Enhanced Wireless 911 Services Act, the 911 Service System Act, the Intrastate
Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act, the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act,
the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act, the
Telecommunications Relay System Act, the Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention
Act, and sections 86-574 to 86-578, 86-1031, 86-1307, and 86-1308;
(9) Transmission lines and rights-of-way pursuant to sections 70-301 and
75-702 to 75-724;
(10) Water service pursuant to the Water Service Regulation Act; and
(11) Jurisdictional utilities governed by the State Natural Gas Regulation
Act. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with the provisions of
the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, the provisions of the State Natural Gas
Regulation Act control.
Sec. 2. Section 75-126, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
75-126 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no common carrier
shall:
(a) Charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person a greater or
lesser compensation for any services rendered than it charges, demands,
collects, or receives from any other person for doing a like or contemporaneous
service unless required under section 86-465;
(b) Make or give any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any
particular person;
-1-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
(c) Subject any type of traffic to any undue or unreasonable prejudice,
delay, or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever;
(d) Charge or receive any greater compensation in the aggregate for the
transportation of a like kind of property or passengers for a shorter than for
a longer distance over the same line or route, except as the commission may
prescribe in special cases to prevent manifest injuries, except that no
manifest injustice shall be imposed upon any person at intermediate points.
This section shall not prevent the commission from making group or emergency
rates;
(e) Demand, charge, or collect, by any device whatsoever, a lesser or
greater compensation for any service rendered than that filed with or
prescribed by the commission; or
(f) Change any rate, schedule, or classification in any manner whatsoever
before application has been made to the commission and permission granted for
that purpose, except as otherwise provided in section 86-155.
(2) This section shall not prohibit any common carrier from, and a common
carrier shall not be subject to any fine, penalty, or forfeiture for,
performing services free or at reduced rates to:
(a) The United States, the State of Nebraska, or any governmental
subdivision thereof;
(b) The employees, both present and retired, of such common carrier;
(c) Any person when the object is to provide relief in case of any
disaster;
(d) Any person who transports property for charitable purposes;
(e) Ministers and others giving their entire time to religious or
charitable work;
(f) Any person who is legally blind or visually handicapped; or
(g) Any person who is sixty-five years of age or older.
Sec. 3. Section 75-132.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-132.01 (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 75-131, the
commission shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over any action
concerning a violation of any provision of (a) the Automatic Dialing-Announcing
Devices Act, the Emergency Telephone Communications Systems Act, the Enhanced
Wireless 911 Services Act, the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act, the
Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act, the Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund Act, the Telecommunications Relay System Act, or the
Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act, or the 911 Service System Act by
any person providing telecommunications service for a fee in Nebraska
intrastate commerce pursuant to such acts or (b) sections 86-574 to 86-578 by
an agency or political subdivision of the state.
(2) If the commission enters an order declining jurisdiction under
subsection (1) of this section, any interested person may petition the district
court of the county in which such alleged violation has occurred. If it appears
to the court, after a hearing, that a provision of such acts or sections has
been violated, the court may issue an injunction or other proper process to
restrain the telecommunications company and its directors, officers, employees,
or agents or the agency or political subdivision of the state from continuing
such violation and may order additional relief. Any party to the case shall
have the right to appeal the decision of the district court to the Court of
Appeals under the rules provided by law for appeals in civil cases.
Sec. 4. Section 75-156, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
75-156 (1) In addition to other penalties and relief provided by law, the
Public Service Commission may, upon a finding that the violation is proven by
clear and convincing evidence, assess a civil penalty of up to ten thousand
dollars per day against any person, motor carrier, regulated motor carrier,
common carrier, contract carrier, licensee, grain dealer, or grain warehouse
operator for each violation of (a) any provision of the laws of this state
within the jurisdiction of the commission as enumerated in section 75-109.01,
(b) any term, condition, or limitation of any certificate, permit, license, or
authority issued by the commission pursuant to the laws of this state within
the jurisdiction of the commission as enumerated in section 75-109.01, or (c)
any rule, regulation, or order of the commission issued under authority
delegated to the commission pursuant to the laws of this state within the
jurisdiction of the commission as enumerated in section 75-109.01.
(2) In addition to other penalties and relief provided by law, the Public
Service Commission may, upon a finding that the violation is proven by clear
and convincing evidence, assess a civil penalty not less than one hundred
dollars and not more than one thousand dollars against any jurisdictional
utility for each violation of (a) any provision of the State Natural Gas
Regulation Act, (b) any rule, regulation, order, or lawful requirement issued
by the commission pursuant to the act, (c) any final judgment or decree made by
any court upon appeal from any order of the commission, or (d) any term,
condition, or limitation of any certificate issued by the commission issued
under authority delegated to the commission pursuant to the act. The amount of
the civil penalty assessed in each case shall be based on the severity of the
violation charged. The commission may compromise or mitigate any penalty prior
to hearing if all parties agree. In determining the amount of the penalty, the
commission shall consider the appropriateness of the penalty in light of the
gravity of the violation and the good faith of the violator in attempting to
achieve compliance after notification of the violation is given.
(3) In addition to other penalties and relief provided by law, the Public
-2-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
Service Commission may, upon a finding that the violation is proven by clear
and convincing evidence, assess a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars
per day against any wireless carrier for each violation of the Enhanced
Wireless 911 Service System Services Act or any rule, regulation, or order of
the commission issued under authority delegated to the commission pursuant to
the act.
(4) In addition to other penalties and relief provided by law, the Public
Service Commission may, upon a finding that the violation is proven by clear
and convincing evidence, assess a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars
against any person for each violation of the Nebraska Uniform Standards for
Modular Housing Units Act or the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes
and Recreational Vehicles or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission
issued under the authority delegated to the commission pursuant to either act.
Each such violation shall constitute a separate violation with respect to each
modular housing unit, manufactured home, or recreational vehicle, except that
the maximum penalty shall not exceed one million dollars for any related series
of violations occurring within one year from the date of the first violation.
(5) The civil penalty assessed under this section shall not exceed two
million dollars per year for each violation except as provided in subsection
(4) of this section. The amount of the civil penalty assessed in each case
shall be based on the severity of the violation charged. The commission may
compromise or mitigate any penalty prior to hearing if all parties agree. In
determining the amount of the penalty, the commission shall consider the
appropriateness of the penalty in light of the gravity of the violation and the
good faith of the violator in attempting to achieve compliance after
notification of the violation is given.
(6) Upon notice and hearing in accordance with this section and section
75-157, the commission may enter an order assessing a civil penalty of up to
one hundred dollars against any person, firm, partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, cooperative, or association for failure to file an annual
report or pay the fee as required by section 75-116 and as prescribed by
commission rules and regulations or for failure to register as required by
section 86-125 and as prescribed by commission rules and regulations. Each day
during which the violation continues after the commission has issued an order
finding that a violation has occurred constitutes a separate offense. Any party
aggrieved by an order of the commission under this section may appeal. The
appeal shall be in accordance with section 75-136.
(7) When any person or party is accused of any violation listed in this
section, the commission shall notify such person or party in writing (a)
setting forth the date, facts, and nature of each act or omission upon which
each charge of a violation is based, (b) specifically identifying the
particular statute, certificate, permit, rule, regulation, or order purportedly
violated, (c) that a hearing will be held and the time, date, and place of the
hearing, (d) that in addition to the civil penalty, the commission may enforce
additional penalties and relief as provided by law, and (e) that upon failure
to pay any civil penalty determined by the commission, the penalty may be
collected by civil action in the district court of Lancaster County.
Sec. 5. Section 77-2703.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2703.04 (1) Except for the telecommunications service defined in
subsection (3) of this section, the sale of telecommunications service sold on
a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to (a) each level of taxing jurisdiction
where the call originates and terminates in that jurisdiction or (b) each level
of taxing jurisdiction where the call either originates or terminates and in
which the service address is also located.
(2) Except for the telecommunications service defined in subsection (3) of
this section, a sale of telecommunications service sold on a basis other than a
call-by-call basis and ancillary services are sourced to the customer's place
of primary use.
(3)(a) For mobile telecommunications service and ancillary services
provided and billed to a customer by a home service provider:
(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any local ordinance or
resolution, such mobile telecommunications service is deemed to be provided by
the customer's home service provider;
(ii) All taxable charges for such mobile telecommunications service and
ancillary services shall be subject to tax by the state or other taxing
jurisdiction in this state whose territorial limits encompass the customer's
place of primary use regardless of where the mobile telecommunications service
originates, terminates, or passes through; and
(iii) No taxes, charges, or fees may be imposed on a customer with a place
of primary use outside this state.
(b) In accordance with the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act,
as such act existed on July 20, 2002, the Tax Commissioner may, but is not
required to:
(i) Provide or contract for a tax assignment database based upon standards
identified in 4 U.S.C. 119, as such section existed on July 20, 2002, with the
following conditions:
(A) If such database is provided, a home service provider shall be held
harmless for any tax that otherwise would result from any errors or omissions
attributable to reliance on such database; or
(B) If such database is not provided, a home service provider may rely on
an enhanced zip code for identifying the proper taxing jurisdictions and shall
be held harmless for any tax that otherwise would result from any errors or
-3-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
omissions attributable to reliance on such enhanced zip code if the home
service provider identified the taxing jurisdiction through the exercise of due
diligence and complied with any procedures that may be adopted by the Tax
Commissioner. Any such procedure shall be in accordance with 4 U.S.C. 120, as
such section existed on July 20, 2002; and
(ii) Adopt procedures for correcting errors in the assignment of primary
use that are consistent with 4 U.S.C. 121, as such section existed on July 20,
2002.
(c) If charges for mobile telecommunications service that are not subject
to tax are aggregated with and not separately stated on the bill from charges
that are subject to tax, the total charge to the customer shall be subject to
tax unless the home service provider can reasonably separate charges not
subject to tax using the records of the home service provider that are kept in
the regular course of business.
(d) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Customer means an individual, business, organization, or other person
contracting to receive mobile telecommunications service from a home service
provider. Customer does not include a reseller of mobile telecommunications
service or a serving carrier under an arrangement to serve the customer outside
the home service provider's service area;
(ii) Home service provider means a telecommunications company as defined
in section 86-322 that has contracted with a customer to provide mobile
telecommunications service;
(iii) Mobile telecommunications service means a wireless communication
service carried on between mobile stations or receivers and land stations, and
by mobile stations communicating among themselves, and includes (A) both one-
way and two-way wireless communication services, (B) a mobile service which
provides a regularly interacting group of base, mobile, portable, and
associated control and relay stations, whether on an individual, cooperative,
or multiple basis for private one-way or two-way land mobile radio
communications by eligible users over designated areas of operation, and (C)
any personal communication service;
(iv) Place of primary use means the street address representative of where
the customer's use of mobile telecommunications service primarily occurs. The
place of primary use shall be the residential street address or the primary
business street address of the customer and shall be within the service area of
the home service provider; and
(v) Tax means the sales taxes levied under sections 13-319, 77-2703,
77-27,142, and 77-6403, the surcharges levied under the Enhanced Wireless 911
Services Act, the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act, and
the Telecommunications Relay System Act, and the 911 Service System Act, and
any other tax levied against the customer based on the amount charged to the
customer. Tax does not mean an income tax, property tax, franchise tax, or any
other tax levied on the home service provider that is not based on the amount
charged to the customer.
(4) A sale of post-paid calling service is sourced to the origination
point of the telecommunications signal as first identified by either (a) the
seller's telecommunications system, or (b) information received by the seller
from its service provider, where the system used to transport such signals is
not that of the seller.
(5) A sale of prepaid calling service or a sale of a prepaid wireless
calling service is sourced in accordance with section 77-2703.01, except that
in the case of a sale of a prepaid wireless calling service, the rule provided
in section 77-2703.01 shall include as an option the location associated with
the mobile telephone number.
(6) A sale of a private communication service is sourced as follows:
(a) Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel
termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which such
customer channel termination point is located;
(b) Service where all customer termination points are located entirely
within one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced in such
jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located;
(c) Service for segments of a channel between two customer channel
termination points located in different jurisdictions and which segments of
channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent in each level of
jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located; and
(d) Service for segments of a channel located in more than one
jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not separately
billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the percentage determined by
dividing the number of customer channel termination points in such jurisdiction
by the total number of customer channel termination points.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) 800 service means a telecommunications service that allows a caller to
dial a toll-free number without incurring a charge for the call. The service is
typically marketed under the name 800, 855, 866, 877, and 888 toll-free
calling, and any subsequent numbers designated by the Federal Communications
Commission;
(b) 900 service means an inbound toll telecommunications service purchased
by a subscriber that allows the subscriber's customers to call in to the
subscriber's prerecorded announcement or live service. 900 service does not
include the charge for collection services provided by the seller of the
telecommunications services to the subscriber or service or product sold by the
subscriber to the subscriber's customer. The service is typically marketed
-4-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
under the name 900 service, and any subsequent numbers designated by the
Federal Communications Commission;
(c) Air-to-ground radiotelephone service means a radio telecommunication
service, as that term is defined in 47 C.F.R. 22.99, as such regulation existed
on January 1, 2007, in which common carriers are authorized to offer and
provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in aircraft;
(d) Ancillary services means services that are associated with or
incidental to the provision of telecommunications services, including, but not
limited to, detailed telecommunications billings, directory assistance,
vertical service, and voice mail services;
(e) Call-by-call basis means any method of charging for telecommunications
service where the price is measured by individual calls;
(f) Coin-operated telephone service means a telecommunications service
paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct deposits of money
to operate;
(g) Communications channel means a physical or virtual path of
communications over which signals are transmitted between or among customer
channel termination points;
(h) Conference bridging service means an ancillary service that links two
or more participants of an audio or video conference call and may include the
provision of a telephone number. Conference bridging service does not include
the telecommunications services used to reach the conference bridge;
(i) Customer means the person or entity that contracts with the seller of
telecommunications service. If the end user of telecommunications service is
not the contracting party, the end user of the telecommunications service is
the customer of the telecommunications service, but this sentence only applies
for the purpose of sourcing sales of telecommunications service under this
section. Customer does not include a reseller of telecommunications service or
for mobile telecommunications service of a serving carrier under an agreement
to serve the customer outside the home service provider's licensed service
area;
(j) Customer channel termination point means the location where the
customer either inputs or receives the communications;
(k) Detailed telecommunications billing service means an ancillary service
of separately stating information pertaining to individual calls on a
customer's billing statement;
(l) Directory assistance means an ancillary service of providing telephone
number information and address information;
(m) End user means the person who utilizes the telecommunications service.
In the case of an entity, end user means the individual who utilizes the
service on behalf of the entity;
(n) Fixed wireless service means a telecommunications service that
provides radio communication between fixed points;
(o) International means a telecommunications service that originates or
terminates in the United States and terminates or originates outside the United
States, respectively. United States includes the District of Columbia or a
United States territory or possession;
(p) Interstate means a telecommunications service that originates in one
state of the United States, or a territory or possession of the United States,
and terminates in a different state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(q) Intrastate means a telecommunications service that originates in one
state of the United States, or a territory or possession of the United States,
and terminates in the same state, territory, or possession of the United
States;
(r) Mobile wireless service means a telecommunications service that is
transmitted, conveyed, or routed regardless of the technology used, whereby the
origination and termination points of the transmission, conveyance, or routing
are not fixed, including, by way of example only, telecommunications services
that are provided by a commercial mobile radio service provider;
(s) Paging service means a telecommunications service that provides
transmission of coded radio signals for the purpose of activating specific
pagers. Such transmission may include messages and sounds;
(t) Pay telephone services means a telecommunications service provided
through pay telephones;
(u) Post-paid calling service means the telecommunications service
obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the use of
a credit card or payment mechanism, such as a bank card, travel card, credit
card, or debit card, or by a charge made to a telephone number which is not
associated with the origination or termination of the telecommunications
service. A post-paid calling service includes a telecommunications service,
except a prepaid wireless calling service, that would be a prepaid calling
service except it is not exclusively a telecommunications service;
(v) Prepaid calling service means the right to access exclusively
telecommunications service, which is paid for in advance and which enables the
origination of calls using an access number or authorization code, whether
manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or
dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount;
(w) Prepaid wireless calling service means a telecommunications service
that provides the right to utilize mobile wireless service as well as other
nontelecommunications services, including the download of digital products
delivered electronically, content, and ancillary services, which must be paid
for in advance, that is sold in predetermined units of dollars or which the
-5-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
number declines with use in a known amount;
(x) Private communication service means a telecommunications service that
entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a communications channel
or group of channels between or among termination points, regardless of the
manner in which such channel or channels are connected, and includes switching
capacity, extension lines, stations, and any other associated services that are
provided in connection with the use of such channel or channels;
(y) Residential telecommunications service means a telecommunications
service or ancillary services provided to an individual for personal use at a
residential address, including an individual dwelling unit such as an
apartment. In the case of institutions where individuals reside, such as
schools or nursing homes, telecommunications service is considered residential
if it is provided to and paid for by an individual resident rather than the
institution;
(z) Service address means the location of the telecommunications equipment
to which a customer's call is charged and from which the call originates or
terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid. If this location is
not known, service address means the origination point of the signal of the
telecommunications service first identified either by the seller's
telecommunications system, or in information received by the seller from its
service provider, where the system used to transport such signals is not that
of the seller. If both locations are not known, the service address means the
location of the customer's place of primary use;
(aa) Telecommunications service means the electronic transmission,
conveyance, or routing of voice, data, audio, video, or any other information
or signals to a point, or between or among points. Telecommunications service
includes such transmission, conveyance, or routing in which computer processing
applications are used to act on the form, code, or protocol of the content for
purposes of transmission, conveyance, or routing without regard to whether such
service is referred to as voice over Internet protocol services or is
classified by the Federal Communications Commission as enhanced or value-added.
Telecommunications service does not include:
(i) Data processing and information services that allow data to be
generated, acquired, stored, processed, or retrieved and delivered by an
electronic transmission to a purchaser when such purchaser's primary purpose
for the underlying transaction is the processed data or information;
(ii) Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer's
premises;
(iii) Tangible personal property;
(iv) Advertising, including, but not limited to, directory advertising;
(v) Billing and collection services provided to third parties;
(vi) Internet access service;
(vii) Radio and television audio and video programming services,
regardless of the medium, including the furnishing of transmission, conveyance,
and routing of such services by the programming service provider. Radio and
television audio and video programming services shall include, but not be
limited to, cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522, as such section existed
on January 1, 2007, and audio and video programming services delivered by
providers of commercial mobile radio service as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20.3, as
such regulation existed on January 1, 2007;
(viii) Ancillary services; or
(ix) Digital products delivered electronically, including, but not limited
to, software, music, video, reading materials, or ringtones;
(bb) Value-added, nonvoice data service means a service that otherwise
meets the definition of telecommunications services in which computer
processing applications are used to act on the form, content, code, or protocol
of the information or data primarily for a purpose other than transmission,
conveyance, or routing;
(cc) Vertical service means an ancillary service that is offered in
connection with one or more telecommunications services, which offers advanced
calling features that allow customers to identify callers and to manage
multiple calls and call connections, including conference bridging services;
and
(dd) Voice mail service means an ancillary service that enables the
customer to store, send, or receive recorded messages. Voice mail service does
not include any vertical services that the customer may be required to have in
order to utilize the voice mail service.
Sec. 6. Section 86-124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-124 (1) The commission shall not regulate the following:
(a) One-way broadcast or cable television transmission of television or
radio signals;
(b) Mobile radio services, radio paging services, and wireless
telecommunications service;
(c) Interexchange services; and
(d) Internet-protocol-enabled service and voice over Internet protocol
service, including rates, service or contract terms, conditions, or
requirements for entry for such service.
(2) This section shall not affect or modify:
(a) The enforcement of criminal or civil laws, including, but not limited
to, laws concerning consumer protection and unfair or deceptive trade practices
which apply generally to the conduct of business;
(b)(i) Any entity's obligations or rights or commission authority under
-6-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
section 86-122 and under 47 U.S.C. 251 and 252, as such sections existed on
January 1, 2019, and (ii) any carrier-to-carrier tariff rates, service quality
standards, interconnection agreements, or other obligations for which the
commission has jurisdiction under state or federal law;
(c) Any requirement to contribute to any fund administered by the
commission authorized by the Enhanced Wireless 911 Service System Services Act
or the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act;
(d) Any commission jurisdiction over intrastate switched access rates,
terms, and conditions, including the resolution of disputes arising from, and
implementation of federal and state law with respect to, intercarrier
compensation;
(e) The eligibility and requirements for the receipt of funds from the
Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund and the rules, regulations,
and orders under the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act or
the receipt of funds from the federal universal service fund, regardless of the
unregulated status of the provider's service under this section;
(f) Any entity's rights and obligations with respect to (i) registration
under section 86-125, (ii) the use of public streets, roads, highways, and
rights-of-way, or (iii) a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a
permit; and
(g) The commission's authority under section 50 of this act 86-1029.04.
Sec. 7. Section 86-125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-125 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 86-124:
(1) Any communications provider providing service in Nebraska shall file a
registration form with and pay a registration fee to the Public Service
Commission. Any communications provider shall register with the commission
prior to providing service. The commission shall prescribe the registration
form to be filed pursuant to this section;
(2) A communications provider providing the services described in
subdivision (7)(a) of this section shall provide the commission with the name,
address, telephone number, and email address of a contact person concerning:
(a) The Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act and related
surcharges, if applicable;
(b) The Telecommunications Relay System Act and related surcharges, if
applicable;
(c) The Enhanced Wireless 911 Service System Services Act and related
surcharges, if applicable; and
(d) Consumer complaints and inquiries;
(3) A communications provider providing the services described in
subdivision (7)(b) of this section shall provide the commission with the name,
address, telephone number, and email address of a person with managerial
responsibility for Nebraska operations;
(4) A communications provider shall:
(a) Submit a registration fee at the time of submission of the
registration form. The commission shall set the fee in an amount sufficient to
cover the costs of administering the registration process but not to exceed
fifty dollars;
(b) Keep the information required by this section current and notify the
commission of any changes to such information within sixty days after the
change; and
(c) Certify to the commission by January 1 each year that such
communications provider does not use or provide any communications equipment or
service deemed to pose a threat to national security identified on the Covered
List developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R. 1.50002, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2023, and published by the Public Safety and Homeland Security
Bureau of the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to the federal Secure
and Trusted Communications Networks Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., as
such act existed on January 1, 2023, and the rules adopted pursuant to such act
by the Federal Communications Commission on November 11, 2022, in its Report
and Order FCC 22-84;
(5) The commission may, pursuant to section 75-156, administratively fine
any communications provider which violates this section;
(6) This section applies to all communications providers providing service
in Nebraska except for those communications providers otherwise regulated under
the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act; and
(7) For purposes of this section, communications provider means any entity
that:
(a) Uses telephone numbers or Internet protocol addresses or their
functional equivalents or successors to provide information of a user's
choosing by aid of wire, cable, wireless, satellite, or other like connection,
whether part of a bundle of services or offered separately, (i) which provides
or enables real-time or interactive voice communications and (ii) in which the
voice component is the primary function; or
(b) Provides any service, whether part of a bundle of services or offered
separately, used for transmission of information of a user's choosing
regardless of the transmission medium or technology employed, that connects to
a network that permits the end user to engage in electronic communications,
including, but not limited to, service provided directly (i) to the public or
(ii) to such classes of users as to be effectively available directly to the
public.
Sec. 8. Section 86-163, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-7-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
86-163 The commission shall file with the Clerk of the Legislature an
annual report on or before September 30 of each year on the status of the
Nebraska telecommunications industry. The report shall be submitted in
electronic format. The report shall:
(1) Describe the quality of telecommunications service being provided to
the citizens of Nebraska;
(2) Describe the availability of diverse and affordable telecommunications
service to all of the people of Nebraska;
(3) Describe the level of telecommunications service rates;
(4) Describe the use and continued need for the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund;
(5) Describe the availability and location of 911 service and E-911
service as required by section 62 of this act 86-437;
(6) Describe the availability and location of next-generation wireless 911
service or enhanced wireless 911 service as required by section 55 of this act
86-460;
(7) Address the need for further legislation to achieve the purposes of
the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act; and
(8) Assess, based on information provided by public safety answering
points, the level of next-generation 911 wireless E-911 location accuracy
compliance for wireless carriers.
Sec. 9. Section 86-313, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-313 (1)(a) Each telephone company in Nebraska shall collect from each
of the telephone subscribers a surcharge not to exceed twenty cents per month
on each telephone number or functional equivalent in Nebraska, including
wireless service as defined in section 41 of this act 86-456.01. Except for
wireless service, the surcharge shall only be collected on the first one
hundred telephone numbers or functional equivalents per subscriber. The
companies shall add the surcharge to each subscriber's bill. The surcharge
shall not be collected with respect to prepaid wireless telecommunications
service as defined in the Prepaid Wireless Surcharge Act.
(b) The telephone companies are not liable for any surcharge not paid by a
subscriber.
(2) Before April 1 of each year, the commission shall hold a public
hearing to determine the amount of surcharge necessary to carry out the
Telecommunications Relay System Act. After the hearing, the commission shall
set the surcharge at the level necessary to fund the statewide
telecommunications relay system and the specialized telecommunications
equipment program for the following year plus a reasonable reserve. The
surcharge shall become effective on July 1 following the change.
(3) In an emergency the commission may adjust the amount of the surcharge
to become effective before such date but only after a public hearing for such
purpose.
(4) Each telephone company shall remit the proceeds from the surcharge to
the commission. The commission shall remit the funds to the State Treasurer for
credit to the fund.
(5) The commission may require an audit of any company collecting the
surcharge pursuant to the act.
(6) This section shall not apply to subscribers who have no access to
relay service.
Sec. 10. Section 86-472, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-472 (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) In 2020, Congress enacted the federal National Suicide Hotline
Designation Act of 2020, Public Law 116-172. This federal act designated 988 as
the universal three-digit telephone number within the United States for the
purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline
system operating since 2005 through the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline;
(b) The three-digit 988 code became operational nationally in 2022, and is
a more universal and easy-to-remember way to connect individuals experiencing
mental health-related distress with mental health care professionals; and
(c) The 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline is a national effort, organized at
the state level, and serves as an alternative to 911 in addressing the growing
need for mental health-related crisis intervention in order to save lives.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall:
(a) Oversee administration of the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline in
Nebraska, including contracting for services provided by trained counselors,
call-center operators, and other service providers helping operate the 988
Suicide and Crisis Lifeline network in the state; and
(b) Coordinate and cooperate with the Public Service Commission to ensure
that the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline has the capability to connect
individuals to the 911 service system and also receive communications from the
911 service system as provided under subdivision (6) of section 42 of this act
86-1025.
Sec. 11. Section 86-802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-802 For purposes of the Kelsey Smith Act:
(1) Call location information means the best available location
information, including, but not limited to, information obtained using
historical cellular site information or a mobile locator tool;
(2) Law enforcement agency means a police department, a town marshal, the
office of sheriff, and the Nebraska State Patrol;
-8-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
(3) Wireless carrier has the same meaning as in section 40 of this act
86-456; and
(4) Wireless communication device means any wireless electronic
communication device that provides for voice or data communication between two
or more parties, including a mobile or cellular telephone.
Sec. 12. Section 86-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-903 (1) The Department of Revenue shall determine the prepaid wireless
surcharge annually, effective January 1, based on the charges described in
subsection (2) of this section as in effect on the preceding July 1. The
department shall provide not less than ninety days' advance notice of any
change in the prepaid wireless surcharge on the department's website.
(2) The rate of the prepaid wireless surcharge shall be the sum of the
following three percentages, rounded up to the nearest tenth of one percent:
(a) The percentage obtained by dividing (i) the amount of the wireless
E-911 surcharge authorized under subdivision (1)(b) of section 52 of this act
86-457 by (ii) fifty;
(b) The percentage obtained by dividing (i) the amount of the Nebraska
Telecommunications Relay System Fund surcharge set by the Public Service
Commission pursuant to the Telecommunications Relay System Act by (ii) fifty;
and
(c) The percentage obtained by multiplying (i) the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund surcharge percentage rate set by the
Public Service Commission by (ii) one minus the Federal Communications
Commission safe harbor percentage for determining the interstate portion of a
fixed monthly wireless charge.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall provide the Public Service Commission
with prepaid wireless surcharge calculation and collection data upon request by
the commission.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2013, each seller shall collect the prepaid
wireless surcharge from the consumer with respect to each retail transaction
occurring in this state. The seller shall disclose the amount of the prepaid
wireless surcharge either separately on an invoice, receipt, or other similar
document that is provided to the consumer by the seller or otherwise. A retail
transaction that is effected in person by a consumer at a business location of
the seller shall be treated as occurring in this state if that business
location is in this state, and any other retail transaction shall be treated as
occurring in this state if the retail transaction is treated as occurring in
this state for purposes of section 77-2703.
(5) The prepaid wireless surcharge is the liability of the consumer and
not of the seller or of any provider, except that the seller shall be liable to
remit all prepaid wireless surcharges that the seller collects from consumers
as provided in section 86-904, including all such charges that the seller is
deemed to collect when the amount of the charge has not been separately stated
on an invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by
the seller.
(6) The amount of the prepaid wireless surcharge that is collected by a
seller from a consumer, whether or not such amount is separately stated on an
invoice, receipt, or other similar document provided to the consumer by the
seller, shall not be included in the base for measuring any tax, fee,
surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by this state, any political
subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental agency.
(7) For purposes of subsection (4) of this section, when prepaid wireless
telecommunications service is sold with one or more other products or services
for a single, non-itemized price, the seller shall elect to treat the price of
the prepaid wireless telecommunications service (a) as such entire non-itemized
price, (b) if the amount of prepaid wireless telecommunications service is
disclosed to the consumer as a dollar amount, as such dollar amount, or (c) if
the retailer can identify the portion of the price that is attributable to the
prepaid wireless telecommunications service by reasonable and verifiable
standards from its books and records that are kept in the regular course of
business for other purposes, including, but not limited to, nontax purposes, as
such portion. If the amount of prepaid wireless telecommunications service is
denominated as ten minutes or less or as five dollars or less, the seller may
elect not to collect any prepaid wireless surcharge with respect to the retail
transaction.
Sec. 13. Section 86-905, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-905 The prepaid wireless surcharge shall be the only funding obligation
imposed with respect to prepaid wireless telecommunications service for 911
E-911 service, telecommunications relay service, and universal service in this
state, and no tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge shall be imposed by this
state, any political subdivision of this state, or any intergovernmental
agency, for purposes of funding 911 E-911 service, telecommunications relay
service, or universal service, upon any provider, seller, or consumer with
respect to the sale, purchase, use, or provision of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service.
Sec. 14. Section 86-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1001 Sections 14 to 68 of this act 86-1001 to 86-1029.04 shall be known
and may be cited as the 911 Service System Act.
Sec. 15. Section 86-1002, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-9-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
86-1002 The purpose of the 911 Service System Act is to establish the
Public Service Commission as the statewide implementation and coordinating
authority to plan, implement, coordinate, manage, maintain, and provide funding
assistance for a 911 service system consistent and compatible with national
public safety standards advanced by recognized standards and development
organizations.
Sec. 16. Section 86-1003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1003 It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(1) The commission plan, implement, coordinate, manage, maintain, and
provide funding assistance for a cost-efficient 911 service system;
(2) The commission provide for the coordination of 911 service on a
statewide basis;
(3) Local governing bodies be responsible for the dispatch and provision
of emergency services;
(4) As part of the coordination of statewide 911 service, the commission
secure stakeholder support and provide public education, training, standards
enforcement, dispute resolution, and program evaluation for public safety
answering points;
(5) The jurisdictions of the state, regional, and local governing bodies
be clearly defined and aligned to produce the most efficient provision of 911
service, including next-generation 911 service capability;
(6) The commission adopt statewide uniform standards for technical
support, training efficiency, and quality assurance for public safety answering
points;
(7) The express authority granted to the commission to implement the 911
Service System Act not be deemed to supersede or otherwise modify section
86-124 or to provide the commission with any additional authority not provided
by law existing on April 19, 2016, including, but not limited to, regulatory
authority over originating service providers except as provided under section
50 of this act 86-1029.04; and
(8) Except as specifically provided in the 911 Service System Act, nothing
in the 911 Service System Act be deemed to supersede or modify any commission
authority provided by law or any commission order, rule, or regulation existing
on April 19, 2016.
Sec. 17. Section 86-1004, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1004 For purposes of the 911 Service System Act, the definitions found
in sections 18 to 41 of this act 86-1005 to 86-1024.01 apply.
Sec. 18. Section 86-1006, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1006 Commission means the Public Service Commission.
Sec. 19. Section 86-1006.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1006.01 Committee means the 911 Service System Advisory Committee.
Sec. 20. Section 86-1007, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1007 Emergency services means the provision through a public safety
agency of firefighting, law enforcement, ambulance, emergency, medical, or
other public emergency services, as determined by a local governing body, to
respond to and manage emergency incidents.
Sec. 21. Section 86-449.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-449.01 Home service provider means a telecommunications company as
defined in section 86-322 that has contracted with a customer to provide
wireless service.
Sec. 22. Section 86-1011, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1011 Internet protocol means the method by which data is sent from one
computer to another on the Internet or other networks.
Sec. 23. Section 86-1012, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1012 Internet protocol-enabled service means any service, capability,
functionality, or application provided using Internet protocol, or any
successor protocol, that enables a service user to send or receive a
communication in Internet protocol format including, but not limited to, voice,
data, or video.
Sec. 24. Section 86-1013, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1013 Local governing body means a county board, city council of a city,
board of trustees of a village, board of directors of any rural or suburban
fire protection district, or any governing body of an entity created pursuant
to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act.
Sec. 25. Section 86-1014, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1014 Network means (1) a legacy telecommunications network that
supports basic 911 service and enhanced-911 service or (2) a managed Internet
protocol network that is used for 911 calls, that can be shared by all public
safety answering points, and that provides the Internet protocol transport
infrastructure upon which independent application platforms and core functional
processes can be deployed, including, but not limited to, those necessary for
providing next-generation 911 service capability. A network may be constructed
from a mix of dedicated and shared facilities and may be interconnected at
-10-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
local, regional, state, national, and international levels.
Sec. 26. Section 86-1015, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1015 Next-generation 911 means an Internet protocol-based system that:
(1) Ensures interoperability;
(2) Is secure;
(3) Employs commonly accepted standards;
(4) Enables emergency communications centers to receive, process, and
analyze all types of 911 requests for emergency services;
(5) Acquires and integrates additional information useful to handling 911
requests for emergency services; and
(6) Supports sharing information related to 911 requests for emergency
services among public safety answering points and emergency service providers.
(1) comprised of networks, functional elements, and databases that
replicate basic 911 service and enhanced-911 service features and functions and
provide additional capabilities and (2) designed to provide access to emergency
services from all connected communications sources and to provide multimedia
data capabilities for public safety answering points and other emergency
services organizations.
Sec. 27. Section 86-1017, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1017 911 call means any form of communication requesting any type of
emergency services by contacting a public safety answering point, including
voice or nonvoice communications as well as transmission of any analog or
digital data. 911 call includes a voice call, video call, text message, or
data-only call.
Sec. 28. Section 86-1018, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1018 911 service means the service a public safety answering point uses
to receive and process 911 calls over a 911 service system.
Sec. 29. Section 86-429, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-429 911 service area means (1) the portion of a local governing body's
jurisdiction in which 911 service is provided and (2) an area being provided
911 service by contract with a service supplier on or before January 1, 1990,
notwithstanding the crossing of jurisdictional lines, until such time as the
noncontracting local governing body notifies the contracting local governing
body in writing of its intention to opt out of the 911 service area.
Sec. 30. Section 86-1019, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1019 911 service system means a coordinated system of technologies,
software applications, databases, customer-premise equipment components, and
operations and management procedures used to provide 911 service through the
operation of an efficient and effective network for accepting, processing, and
delivering 911 calls to a public safety answering point, including, but not
limited to, basic 911 service, enhanced-911 service, enhanced wireless 911
service, next-generation 911 service, and any emerging technologies, networks,
and systems that allow access to 911 service.
Sec. 31. Section 86-1020, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1020 Except as provided in section 50 of this act, originating
Originating service provider means an entity that provides the capability for
customers to originate 911 calls to public safety answering points.
Sec. 32. Section 86-429.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-429.01 Primary place of use means the residential or business street
address that is representative of the primary location of the customer's use of
a service that includes the provision of 911 service.
Sec. 33. Section 86-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1021 Public safety agency means an agency which provides emergency
services.
Sec. 34. Section 86-1022, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1022 Public safety answering point means a local governmental entity
responsible for receiving 911 calls and processing those calls according to a
specific operational policy.
Sec. 35. Section 86-432, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-432 Service supplier means any person providing 911 service in this
state.
Sec. 36. Section 86-433, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-433 Service surcharge means a charge set by a local governing body and
assessed on each telephone number or functional equivalent of service users
whose primary place of use is within the local governing body's designated 911
service area, with the exception of those service users served by wireless
carriers as defined in section 86-456 and those service users who have no
access to 911 service.
Sec. 37. Section 86-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1023 Service user means any person who initiates a 911 call to receive
emergency services.
-11-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
Sec. 38. Section 86-1024, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1024 Stakeholder means a public safety answering point, a public safety
agency, and any person, organization, agency of government, originating service
provider, or other organization that has a vital interest in the 911 service
system.
Sec. 39. Section 86-1024.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1024.01 Telecommunications relay services has the same meaning as in 47
C.F.R. 9.3, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2024.
Sec. 40. Section 86-456, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-456 Wireless carrier means (1) any carrier of mobile service as
referenced in 47 U.S.C. 153(33) 153(27), as such section existed on January 1,
2025 2007, (2) any carrier of commercial mobile service as referenced in 47
U.S.C. 332(d)(1), as such section existed on January 1, 2025 2007, (3) any
carrier of commercial mobile radio service as referenced in 47 C.F.R. 20.3
20.9, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025 2007, or (4) any cellular
radiotelephone service as referenced in subpart H of 47 C.F.R. 22, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2025, (5) any licensees of a personal
communications service as referenced in 47 C.F.R. 24, as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2025, or (6) any and specialized mobile radio services as
referenced in subpart S of 47 C.F.R. 90 20.9, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2025 2007.
Sec. 41. Section 86-456.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-456.01 Wireless service means: (1) Any mobile service as defined in 47
U.S.C. 153 and 47 C.F.R. 27.4, as such section and regulation existed on
January 1, 2025 2007; (2) any commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C.
332(d), as such section existed on January 1, 2025 2007; or (3) any commercial
mobile radio service as referenced in 47 C.F.R. 20.3 20.9, as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2025 2007.
Sec. 42. Section 86-1025, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1025 The commission shall:
(1) Serve as the statewide coordinating authority for the implementation
of the 911 service system;
(2) Be responsible for statewide planning, implementation, coordination,
funding assistance, deployment, regulation, and management and maintenance of
the 911 service system to ensure that coordinated 911 service is provided to
all residents of the state at a consistent level of service in a cost-effective
manner;
(3) Be responsible for establishing mandatory and uniform technical and
training standards applicable to public safety answering points and adopting
and promulgating rules and regulations applicable to public safety answering
points for quality assurance standards;
(4) Appoint the members of the committee and act on the committee's
recommendations as provided in section 43 of this act 86-1025.01;
(5)(a) Determine how to allocate the 911 Service System Fund in order to
facilitate the planning, implementation, coordination, operation, management,
and maintenance of the 911 service system;
(b) Create a mechanism for determining the level of funding available to
or for the benefit of local governing bodies, public safety answering points,
and third-party service or infrastructure providers for costs determined to be
eligible by the commission under subdivision (5)(c) of this section; and
(c) Establish standards and criteria concerning disbursements from the 911
Service System Fund for the planning, implementation, coordination, operation,
management, and maintenance of the 911 service system. In establishing such
standards and criteria, the following may be eligible for funding:
(i) Costs incurred by or on behalf of local governing bodies or public
safety answering points to provide 911 service, including, but not limited to,
(A) acquisition of new equipment and related maintenance costs and license
fees, (B) upgrades and modifications, (C) delivering next-generation 911 core
services, and (D) training personnel used to provide 911 services; and
(ii) Costs incurred by or on behalf of local governing bodies or public
safety answering points for the acquisition, installation, maintenance, and
operation of telecommunications equipment and telecommunications service
required for the provision of 911 service; and
(6) Adopt statewide uniform standards for technical enhancement, support,
training, and quality assurance that will allow the 911 service system to
communicate, coordinate, and engage with the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline.
Such standards shall provide that service users calling the 911 service system
can be connected to the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, and individuals
calling the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline can be connected to the 911 service
system, when deemed appropriate by the call-center operators. The purpose of
such dual capability is to facilitate the provision of appropriate emergency
services, including instances requiring counseling services for an individual
in psychological distress. The standards shall be completed so that the dual
capability to connect individuals between both the 988 Suicide and Crisis
Lifeline and the 911 service system is operational no later than January 1,
2025.
Sec. 43. Section 86-1025.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-12-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
86-1025.01 (1) The 911 Service System Advisory Committee is created. The
committee shall advise the commission concerning the implementation,
coordination, operation, management, maintenance, and funding of the 911
service system and provide input on technical training and quality assurance.
The state 911 director and the Chief Information Officer or his or her designee
shall serve as ex officio members. The committee shall include the following
individuals appointed by the commission:
(a) Four representatives of public safety agencies within the state,
including an emergency manager, a member of a law enforcement agency, a member
of a fire department, and a member of an emergency medical service as defined
in section 38-1207;
(b) Two county officials or employees;
(c) Two municipal officials or employees;
(d) Two representatives of the telecommunications industry;
(e) Two managers of public safety answering points, one of whom is
employed by a county sheriff and one of whom is not employed by a county
sheriff;
(f) One representative of the Nebraska Association of County Officials;
and
(g) One representative of the League of Nebraska Municipalities.
(2) Of the fourteen appointed members of the committee described in
subdivisions (1)(a) through (g) of this section, at least two four members
shall be appointed from each of the three congressional districts. Beginning in
2025, the terms of the current members shall expire in staggered three-year
terms such that no more than one-third of the committee membership will expire
at any one time as determined by the commission. The appointed members of the
committee shall serve for terms of three years. A vacancy shall be filled for
the remainder of the unexpired term. The committee shall annually select a
chairperson and vice-chairperson and meet as often as necessary to carry out
its duties. Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for expenses as
provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(3) The committee shall make any recommendations to the commission
regarding the exercise of the commission's duties administering the 911 service
system pursuant to section 42 of this act 86-1025, including recommending the
adoption and promulgation of any rules and regulations necessary to carry out
the purposes of the 911 Service System Act, and may advise on or the
introduction of any legislation. The commission may consider and implement any
such recommendations.
Sec. 44. Section 86-1026, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1026 The commission shall appoint a state 911 director to manage the
department established within the commission for the 911 service system. The
commission shall ensure that the department has all necessary staffing and
resources. The commission may retain contracted experts or consultants who may
be required for the administration of the 911 Service System Act.
Sec. 45. Section 86-1028, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1028 (1) The 911 Service System Fund is created. The fund shall consist
of surcharges collected pursuant to section sections 86-457 and 86-904 and
section 52 of this act, money transferred from the Enhanced Wireless 911 Fund,
any federal funds received for implementation and development of 911 service,
and any other money designated for credit to the 911 Service System Fund. The
fund shall be used for the costs of administering the fund , for the purposes
specified in section 86-465 unless otherwise directed by federal law with
respect to any federal funds, and for the purposes specified in the 911 Service
System Act. The costs of administering the 911 Service System Fund shall be
kept to a minimum.
(2) The fund shall not be subject to any fiscal-year limitation or lapse
provision of unexpended balance at the end of any fiscal year or biennium. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act , and for the period July 1, 2017, through
June 30, 2019, any interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the General
Fund.
(3) Money in the 911 Service System Fund may be used to pay for costs
incurred by or on behalf of local governing bodies or public safety answering
points to provide 911 service that are determined by the commission to be
eligible for funding. The commission is not required to provide funding from
the 911 Service System Fund to more than one public safety answering point in
any county. Each entity that receives disbursements from the fund under this
subsection shall make a full accounting of the money in a manner and form
prescribed by the commission.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Enhanced Wireless
911 Fund on July 1, 2018, to the 911 Service System Fund.
Sec. 46. Section 86-1029, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1029 The express authority granted to the commission to implement the
911 Service System Act shall not be deemed to supersede or otherwise modify
section 86-124 or to provide the commission with any additional authority not
provided by law existing on April 19, 2016, including, but not limited to,
regulatory authority over originating service providers except as provided
under section 50 of this act 86-1029.04.
Sec. 47. Section 86-1029.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-13-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
amended to read:
86-1029.01 The commission may apply for any federal or other funds
available for next-generation 911 service and may distribute such federal funds
consistent with federal law and other funds consistent with the directives,
purposes, or conditions of such other funds. Except for intentional acts, the
commission shall be immune from liability or the payment of damages in applying
for any such federal funds. The state 911 director shall be the designated
single point of contact for any federal 911 grant program.
Sec. 48. Section 86-1029.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1029.02 Any person involved in the provision of next-generation 911
service who: (1) Receives, develops, collects, or processes information for any
911 database; (2) provides local exchange, interexchange, or transport service
in connection with any next-generation 911 service; (3) relays, transfers,
operates, maintains, or provides next-generation 911 service or systems
capabilities, including interoperable connections between the 911 service
system and the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline; or (4) provides next-generation
911 communications service for emergency service providers shall, except for
failure to use reasonable care or for intentional acts, be immune from
liability or the payment of damages in the performance of installing,
maintaining, or providing next-generation 911 service.
Sec. 49. Section 86-1029.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1029.03 The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the 911 Service System Act.
Sec. 50. Section 86-1029.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1029.04 (1) For purposes of this section, originating service provider
means the telecommunications service provider, whether by wireline or wireless
service, or the voice over Internet protocol service provider providing the
capability for customers to originate 911 calls.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(c) of this section, or unless
otherwise required by the Federal Communications Commission, no later than
January 1, 2026, an originating service provider and the next-generation 911
service contractor shall cause:
(i) All 911 calls to be transmitted to the next-generation 911 network
that allows 911 calls to be answered; and
(ii) All translation and routing to be completed to deliver all 911 calls,
including associated location information in the requested Internet protocol-
enabled service format, to the next-generation 911 network that allows 911
calls to be answered.
(b) No later than ten months prior to the date set forth in subdivision
(2)(a) of this section, an originating service provider and the next-generation
911 service contractor shall enter into an agreement to cause the requirements
of such subdivision to be met. If the originating service provider and the
next-generation 911 service contractor have not entered into an agreement by
such date, the originating service provider and the next-generation 911 service
contractor shall notify the Public Service Commission to seek resolution of any
unresolved issues in accordance with the commission's policies relating to
interconnection arbitration and mediation.
(c) An originating service provider may enter into an agreement with the
commission to establish an alternative timeframe for meeting the requirements
of subdivision (2)(a) of this section. The originating service provider shall
notify the commission of the dates and terms of the alternative timeframe
within thirty days after entering into such agreement.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, or unless
otherwise required by the Federal Communications Commission, no later than
January 1, 2026, a provider of telecommunications relay services and the next-
generation 911 service contractor shall cause:
(i) All 911 calls to be transmitted to the next-generation 911 network
that allows 911 calls to be answered; and
(ii) All translation and routing to be completed to deliver all 911 calls,
including associated location information if received from the originating
service provider in the requested Internet protocol-enabled service format, to
the next-generation 911 network that allows 911 calls to be answered.
(b) No later than ten months prior to the date set forth in subdivision
(3)(a) of this section, a provider of telecommunications relay services and the
next-generation 911 service contractor shall enter into an agreement to cause
the requirements of such subdivision to be met. If the provider of
telecommunications relay services and the next-generation 911 service
contractor have not entered into an agreement by such date, the provider of
telecommunications relay services and the next-generation 911 service
contractor shall notify the Public Service Commission to seek resolution of any
unresolved issues in accordance with the commission's policies relating to
interconnection arbitration and mediation.
(c) A provider of telecommunications relay services may enter into an
agreement with the commission to establish an alternative timeframe for meeting
the requirements of subdivision (3)(a) of this section. The telecommunications
relay provider shall notify the commission of the dates and terms of the
alternative timeframe within thirty days after entering into such agreement.
(4) No later than November 15, 2024, and no later than November 15 of each
year thereafter, the next-generation 911 service contractor shall submit an
annual report electronically to the Transportation and Telecommunications
-14-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
Committee of the Legislature and to the commission on the capabilities and
redundancies of the next-generation 911 service network.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify or change any
requirement for an originating service provider to file a report with state and
federal entities, including with public safety answering points and local
governing bodies, in accordance with applicable local, state, or federal
regulations and policies, regarding any impediment to transmitting and
delivering 911 calls to the next-generation 911 network.
Sec. 51. Section 86-1031, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1031 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Communications service provider means a cable operator as defined in
47 U.S.C. 522, a provider of information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153,
or a telecommunications carrier as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, but does not
include a wireless provider; and
(b) 911 service has the same meaning as in section 86-1018; and
(b) (c) Outage has the same meaning as described in 47 C.F.R. 4.5(e).
(2) A communications service provider that is required to file reports
with the Federal Communications Commission regarding a 911 service outage
pursuant to 47 C.F.R. 4.9(h) shall also file copies of such reports with the
Public Service Commission. The reports filed with the Public Service Commission
shall follow the same timelines and provide the same information as outlined in
47 C.F.R. 4.9 and 4.11. Reports filed pursuant to this section shall be deemed
confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure pursuant to sections
84-712 to 84-712.09.
(3)(a) The Public Service Commission shall hold a public hearing no later
than ninety days after receipt of the first report filed by a communications
service provider pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The commission may
delay the hearing for good cause shown, but such delay shall be extended no
longer than thirty days. The commission may hold subsequent hearings as it
deems necessary.
(b) This subsection shall not apply if:
(i) The communications service provider has, in good faith, withdrawn the
first report filed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; or
(ii) The Public Service Commission has waived the requirements of this
subsection by a majority vote of the commission.
(4) The Public Service Commission may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
(5) This section shall only apply to 911 service outages in Nebraska.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the Public
Service Commission to regulate any activities prohibited by section 86-124.
Sec. 52. Section 86-457, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-457 (1) Each wireless carrier shall collect:
(a) A surcharge of up to seventy cents, except as provided in subdivision
(1)(b) of this subsection, on all active telephone numbers or functional
equivalents every month from users of wireless service and shall remit the
surcharge in accordance with section 54 of this act 86-459; or
(b) A surcharge of up to fifty cents on all active telephone numbers or
functional equivalents every month from users of wireless service whose primary
place of use is in a county containing a city of the metropolitan class and
shall remit the surcharge in accordance with section 54 of this act 86-459.
The wireless carrier is not liable for any surcharge not paid by a
customer and is not required to collect the wireless surcharge for any
customers receiving services under the Nebraska Telephone Assistance Program
who do not receive a monthly charge for service through a billing statement.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the wireless carrier
shall add the surcharge to each user's billing statement. The surcharge shall
appear as a separate line-item charge on the user's billing statement and shall
be labeled as " Enhanced Wireless 911 Surcharge" or a reasonable abbreviation
of such phrase.
(3) If a wireless carrier, except as otherwise provided in this section,
resells its service through other entities, each reseller shall collect the
surcharge from its customers and shall remit the surcharge in accordance with
section 54 of this act 86-459.
(4) The surcharges authorized by this section shall not apply to prepaid
wireless telecommunications service as defined in section 86-902.
(5) This section shall not apply to users who have no 911 service.
Sec. 53. Section 86-458, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-458 The commission shall hold a public hearing annually to determine
the amount of revenue necessary to carry out the Enhanced Wireless 911 Services
Act and the 911 Service System Act. After the hearing, the commission shall
determine the amount of money to be deposited in the 911 Service System Fund
for the following year and shall set the surcharge subject to the limitation in
section 52 of this act 86-457.
Sec. 54. Section 86-459, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-459 (1) Each wireless carrier shall remit monthly to the commission the
amounts collected pursuant to section 52 of this act 86-457 together with any
forms required by the commission no later than sixty days after the last day of
the month. The commission shall remit the funds to the State Treasurer for
credit to the 911 Service System Fund.
-15-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
(2) As the commission may require, each wireless carrier , except a
wireless carrier whose users have no 911 service, shall report to the
commission on a quarterly basis for each county in a manner prescribed by the
commission the following information: (a) The number of telephone numbers or
functional equivalents served; (b) the number of telephone numbers or
functional equivalents from which it has collected surcharge revenue; (c) the
number of wireless towers by county; and (d) the current implementation status
of enhanced wireless 911 service in each county served by that wireless
carrier.
(3) The wireless carrier shall maintain all records required by this
section, records of the amounts collected pursuant to section 52 of this act
86-457, and remittance records for a period of five years after the date of
remittance to the fund. The commission may require an audit of any wireless
carrier's books and records concerning the collection and remittance of any
amounts collected pursuant to the Enhanced Wireless 911 Service System Services
Act. The costs of any audit required by the commission shall, at the
commission's discretion, be paid by the audited wireless carrier. A wireless
carrier shall not be required to pay for more than one remittance audit or more
than one collection audit per year, unless the commission orders subsequent
audits for good cause.
(4) Each wireless carrier shall comply with all commission rules and
regulations regarding enhanced wireless 911 service.
(5) Each wireless carrier shall comply with this section regardless of
whether the wireless carrier receives reimbursement from the fund. Wireless
carriers failing to comply with this section may be administratively fined by
the commission pursuant to section 75-156.
Sec. 55. Section 86-460, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-460 (1) Each public safety answering point shall report to the
commission annually (a) the name and location of the public safety answering
point and (b) whether next-generation wireless 911 service or enhanced wireless
911 service is provided at that public safety answering point.
(2) The commission shall compile and place the information required in
this section into its annual telecommunications report to the Legislature.
Sec. 56. Section 86-466, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-466 (1) A public safety answering point and wireless carrier may be
compensated for costs determined by the commission to be eligible for funding.
The level of funding available to each public safety answering point and
wireless carrier for eligible cost compensation may be limited based upon the
mechanism established by the commission pursuant to section 86-465. The
commission is not required to provide compensation for costs to more than one
public safety answering point in any county. A public safety answering point or
wireless carrier may apply for disbursement from the 911 Service System Fund by
submitting a written application to the commission. The commission shall
receive and review applications, including supporting documentation. The
commission shall notify each applicant as to the commission's approval or
disapproval of the application.
(2) Each entity that receives disbursements from the 911 Service System
Fund shall make a full accounting of the money in a manner and form prescribed
by the commission.
Sec. 57. Section 86-467, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-467 Information provided by wireless carriers to the advisory board or
the commission pursuant to the Enhanced Wireless 911 Service System Services
Act may be treated as records which may be withheld from the public upon
request of the party submitting such records if the information qualifies under
subdivision (3) of section 84-712.05.
Sec. 58. Section 86-468, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-468 The commission, local governing bodies, and public safety agencies
may provide enhanced wireless 911 service. In contracting for and providing
such service, except for failure to use reasonable care or for intentional
acts, the commission, each local governing body, each public safety agency,
each wireless carrier, and their employees and agents shall be immune from
liability or the payment of damages in the performance of installing,
maintaining, or providing enhanced wireless 911 service.
Sec. 59. Section 86-470, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-470 The commission may assess a civil penalty pursuant to section
75-156 for each violation of any provision of the Enhanced Wireless 911 Service
System Services Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission issued
under authority delegated to the commission pursuant to the act.
Sec. 60. Section 86-435, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-435 (1) A local governing body may incur any nonrecurring or recurring
charges for the installation, maintenance, and operation of 911 service and
shall pay such costs out of general funds which may be supplemented by funds
from the imposition of a service surcharge. A local governing body incurring
costs for 911 service may impose a uniform service surcharge of up to fifty
cents per month on each telephone number or functional equivalent of service
users whose primary place of use is within the local governing body's 911
service area, except for those service users served by wireless carriers as
-16-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
defined in section 86-456 and those service users who have no access to 911
service. The initial service surcharge may be imposed at any time subsequent to
the execution of an agreement for 911 service with a service supplier.
(2) Except in a county containing a city of the metropolitan class, such
uniform service surcharge in subsection (1) of this section may be increased by
an additional amount not to exceed fifty cents per month. Such additional
increase shall be made only after:
(a) Publication of notices for a public hearing. Such notices shall:
(i) Be published at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a
legal newspaper published or of general circulation in the areas affected;
(ii) Set forth the time, place, and date of such public hearing; and
(iii) Set forth the purpose of the public hearing and the purpose of the
increase; and
(b) A public hearing is held pursuant to such notices.
(3) If 911 service is to be provided for a territory which is included in
whole or in part in the jurisdiction of two or more local governing bodies, the
agreement for such service shall be entered into by each such local governing
body unless any such local governing body expressly excludes itself from the
agreement. Such an agreement shall provide that each local governing body which
is a customer of 911 service will pay for its portion of the service. Nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to prevent two or more local governing
bodies from entering into a contract which establishes a separate legal entity
for the purpose of entering into such an agreement as the customer of the
service supplier or any supplier of equipment for 911 service.
(4) If a local governing body's 911 service area includes a local exchange
area which intersects governmental boundary lines, the affected governmental
units may cooperate to provide 911 service through an agreement as provided in
the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act. The agreement
shall provide for the assessment of a uniform service surcharge within a local
governing body's 911 service area. The service surcharge on each telephone
number or functional equivalent of service users whose primary place of use is
within the local governing body's 911 service area, except for those service
users served by wireless carriers as defined in section 86-456 and those
service users who have no access to 911 service, shall be the same as the
amount allowed in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(5) Funds generated by the service surcharge shall be expended only for
the purchase, installation, maintenance, and operation of telecommunications
equipment and telecommunications-related services required for the provision of
911 service.
Sec. 61. Section 86-436, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-436 (1) A service user shall pay service surcharges in each 911 service
area where the service user has its primary place of use and receives 911
service, except that an individual service user shall not be required to pay on
a single periodic billing service surcharges on more than one hundred telephone
numbers or functional equivalents in any single 911 service area. Every service
user shall be liable for any service surcharge billed to such user until the
surcharge has been paid to the service supplier.
(2) The duty of a service supplier to bill a service surcharge to a
service user shall commence at such time as may be specified by the local
governing body. A service surcharge shall be collected as far as practicable at
the same time as and along with the charges for service in accordance with the
regular billing practice of the service supplier.
(3) A service supplier shall have no obligation to take any legal action
to enforce the collection of any service surcharge imposed pursuant to section
60 of this act 86-435. Such action may be brought by or on behalf of the local
governing body imposing the charge or the separate legal entity formed pursuant
to such section. A service supplier shall annually provide the local governing
body a list of the amounts uncollected along with the names and addresses of
those service users who carry a balance that can be determined by the service
supplier to be for nonpayment of any service surcharge. The service supplier
shall not be liable for such uncollected amounts.
Sec. 62. Section 86-437, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-437 (1) The amount of service surcharges collected in one calendar
quarter by a service supplier shall be remitted to the local governing body no
later than sixty days after the close of that calendar quarter. At the time of
the remittance, the service supplier shall file a return for the remittance
with the local governing body in such form as the local governing body and the
service supplier agree upon. The service supplier shall maintain a record of
the amount of service surcharges collected. The record shall be maintained for
a period of one year after the date the amount was billed. A local governing
body may at its own expense require an annual audit of a service supplier's
books and records concerning the collection and remittance of a service
surcharge.
(2) On or before April 30 of each year, each service supplier shall report
for the preceding calendar year to the commission Public Service Commission for
each of its exchanges (a) whether 911 service or E-911 service is provided in
that exchange, (b) the level of the service surcharge, (c) to which local
governing body the service surcharge is being submitted, and (d) the amount of
revenue collected by the service surcharge.
(3) The commission shall compile and place the information from such
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into its annual
-17-

LB362 LB362
2025 2025
telecommunications report to the Legislature, including the availability and
location of 911 service and E-911 service in the State of Nebraska.
(4) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to carry out subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) The commission may administratively fine pursuant to section 75-156
any person who violates the 911 Service System Emergency Telephone
Communications Systems Act.
Sec. 63. Section 86-438, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-438 Each calendar year, the local governing body shall establish the
rate of the service surcharge, not to exceed the amount authorized by section
60 of this act 86-435, that together with any surplus revenue carried forward
will produce sufficient revenue to fund the expenditures necessary to develop,
install, and operate 911 emergency telephone communications systems throughout
the state described in section 86-421. Amounts collected in excess of such
necessary expenditures within a given year shall be carried forward to the next
year. A local governing body shall make its determination of the rate no later
than September 1 of each year and, if it is a new rate, shall fix the new rate
to take effect commencing with the first billing period of each service user on
or following the next January 1. The local governing body shall notify by
certified or registered mail every service supplier of any change in the rate
at least ninety days before the new rate becomes effective.
Sec. 64. Section 86-439, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-439 Funds collected by a local governing body from the imposition of a
service surcharge shall be credited to a separate fund apart from the general
revenue of the local governing body and shall be used solely to pay for costs
for 911 service. Any money remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year
shall remain in the fund for payments during any succeeding year, except that
if 911 service is discontinued, money remaining in the fund after payment of
all costs related to 911 service have been made shall be transferred to the
general fund of the public safety agency or proportionately to the general fund
of each participating public safety agency.
Sec. 65. Section 86-440, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-440 Any local governing body authorized to impose a service surcharge
may enter into an agreement directly with a service supplier of 911 service or
may contract and cooperate with any public safety agency, with other states or
their political subdivisions, or with any association or corporation for the
administration of 911 service as provided by law.
Sec. 66. Section 86-440.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-440.01 Each county shall implement next-generation 911 enhanced-911
service by July 1, 2026 2010.
Sec. 67. Section 86-441, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-441 The 911 service described in the 911 Service System Emergency
Telephone Communications Systems Act is within the governmental powers and
authorities of a local governing body or public safety agency. In contracting
for such 911 service and in providing such 911 service, except for failure to
use reasonable care or for intentional acts, each local governing body, public
safety agency, and service supplier and their employees and agents shall be
immune from liability or the payment for any damages in the performance of
installing, maintaining, or providing 911 service.
Sec. 68. Section 86-441.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-441.01 The commission Public Service Commission may apply for or assist
any political subdivision in applying for any federal or other funds available
for 911 service or E-911 service and may distribute federal funds consistent
with federal law and other funds consistent with the directives, purposes, or
conditions of such other funds. Except for intentional acts, the commission
shall be immune from liability or the payment of damages in assisting any
political subdivision in applying for any such federal funds.
Sec. 69. Original sections 75-132.01, 86-124, 86-125, 86-163, 86-313,
86-429, 86-429.01, 86-432, 86-433, 86-435, 86-436, 86-437, 86-438, 86-439,
86-440, 86-440.01, 86-441, 86-441.01, 86-449.01, 86-456, 86-456.01, 86-457,
86-458, 86-459, 86-460, 86-466, 86-467, 86-468, 86-470, 86-472, 86-802, 86-903,
86-905, 86-1001, 86-1002, 86-1003, 86-1004, 86-1006, 86-1006.01, 86-1007,
86-1011, 86-1012, 86-1013, 86-1014, 86-1015, 86-1017, 86-1018, 86-1019,
86-1020, 86-1021, 86-1022, 86-1023, 86-1024, 86-1024.01, 86-1025, 86-1025.01,
86-1026, 86-1028, 86-1029, 86-1029.01, 86-1029.02, 86-1029.03, 86-1029.04, and
86-1031, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 75-109.01, 75-126,
75-156, and 77-2703.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
Sec. 70. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 86-420,
86-421, 86-422, 86-423, 86-424, 86-425, 86-426, 86-428, 86-430, 86-431, 86-434,
86-442, 86-443, 86-444, 86-445, 86-446, 86-447, 86-448, 86-449, 86-450,
86-450.01, 86-450.03, 86-451, 86-452, 86-453, 86-454, 86-455, 86-461, 86-462,
86-464, 86-465, 86-466.01, 86-469, 86-1005, 86-1008, 86-1009, 86-1010, 86-1016,
and 86-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-18-